Hawaii statutes.
§490:8-113 Statute of frauds inapplicable.
A contract or modification of a contract for the sale or purchase of a security
is enforceable whether or not there is a writing signed or record authenticated
by a party against whom enforcement is sought, even if the contract or
modification is not capable of performance within one year of its making. [L
1997, c 33, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next